Hawaii statutes.
§651-12 Examination of defendant; where no
property known. Whenever it appears by the affidavit of the plaintiff or
by the return of the attachment that no property is known to the plaintiff or
officer on which the attachment can be executed, or not enough to satisfy the
plaintiff's claim, the defendant may be required by the court or judge to
attend before it or the judge, and give information on oath respecting the
same. [L 1905, c 84, §12; RL 1925, §2816; RL 1935, §4201; RL 1945, §10152; RL
1955, §233-12; HRS §651-12; gen ch 1985]

Case Notes

Plaintiffs not entitled to information regarding defendant's
assets, where no attachment obtained and no return made or affidavit filed. 6
H. App. 118, 711 P.2d 1310 (1985).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next